Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
PART 5
PUBLIC HIGHWAY AUTHORITY LAW

43-4-501. Short title.

This part 5 shall be known and may be cited as the "Public Highway Authority Law".

Source:

L. 87:

Entire part added, p. 1843, § 1, effective August 27.

43-4-502. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that:

The necessity for this part 5 results from the large population and population growth within metropolitan regions in the state, from the significant and growing demand for construction of beltways within such metropolitan regions to facilitate traffic movement in such metropolitan regions and the inadequacy of current transportation facilities to meet that demand, from the division of such metropolitan regions into a variety of incorporated and unincorporated areas, from the need to coordinate planning and construction of beltways or other transportation improvements to serve regional needs, and from the limited availability of state and federal funds for such purposes;

The creation of public highway authorities implements section 18 (2) of article XIV of the state constitution and is essential to the continued economic growth of the metropolitan regions of this state, is in the public interest, and will promote the health, safety, and welfare of the citizens of this state by securing for them more adequate transportation;

It is the intention of the general assembly that public highway authorities be formed to finance, construct, operate, or maintain all or a portion of a beltway or other transportation improvements in a metropolitan region which, because of the cost or the location thereof in the jurisdiction of more than one municipality or county, cannot feasibly be financed, constructed, operated, or maintained by a municipality or county acting alone and that it is not the intention of the general assembly that public highway authorities be formed to assume, directly or indirectly, the traditional role of counties or municipalities to finance, construct, operate, or maintain local arterial or collector streets;

It is the intention of the general assembly that a beltway developed pursuant to this part 5 shall ultimately be supported by tolls and that, therefore, it is the intention of the general assembly that revenue-raising powers other than tolls, granted by this part 5 to authorities, counties, and municipalities, shall be terminated at such time as the boards of the authorities determine that projected tolls will be sufficient to meet the authorities' obligations to their bondholders and to operate and maintain such beltways or other transportation improvements.

It is further the intent of the general assembly that no provision of this part 5 shall affect the "Public School Finance Act of 1973", article 50 of title 22, C.R.S., the "Public School Finance Act of 1988", article 53 of title 22, C.R.S., the "Public School Finance Act of 1994", article 54 of title 22, C.R.S., or any additional school financing mechanisms adopted by the general assembly.

The general assembly further finds, determines, and declares that it is the intention of the general assembly that public highway authorities be permitted to qualify as enterprises under section 20 of article X of the state constitution. Since the Colorado supreme court in Nicholl v. E-470 Public Highway Authority, 896 P.2d 859 (Colo. 1995), determined that the power to impose taxes is inconsistent with the establishment of a public highway authority as an "enterprise" under section 20 of article X of the state constitution, those powers of taxation are hereby eliminated by S.B. 96-173, as enacted at the second regular session of the sixtieth general assembly.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire part added, p. 1843, § 1, effective August 27.

L. 89:

(2) amended, p. 1647, § 27, effective June 5.

L. 96:

(3) added, p. 35, § 1, effective March 18.

L. 2007:

(2) amended, p. 2051, § 107, effective June 1.

43-4-503. Definitions.

As used in this part 5, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Authority" means a body corporate and political subdivision of the state created pursuant to this part 5.

"Board" means the board of directors of an authority.

"Bond" means any bond, note, interim certificate, contract, or other evidence of indebtedness of an authority authorized by this part 5.

"Combination" means any two or more municipalities, two or more counties, or one or more municipalities and one or more counties. In addition, "combination" may include the state to the extent authorized by section 43-4-504 (4).

"Construct" or "construction" means the planning, designing, engineering, acquisition, installation, construction, and reconstruction of public highways.

"County" means any county organized under the laws of the state, including any city and county.

"Division" means the division of local government in the department of local affairs.

"Governmental unit" means the state or any political subdivision thereof located in a metropolitan region, except school districts or authorities.

"Metropolitan region" means an area which is designated a consolidated metropolitan statistical area by the federal office of management and budget and has a population in excess of one million persons.

"Municipality" has the same meaning as that provided in section 31-1-101, C.R.S.

"Person" means any natural person, corporation, partnership, association, or joint venture, the United States of America, or any governmental unit.

"Public highway" means a beltway or other transportation improvement located in a metropolitan region which shall be an expressway which generally circumscribes a metropolitan region and will be primarily utilized for major traffic movement at higher traffic speeds. A public highway may, as the board determines, consist of improvements, including, but not limited to, paving, grading, landscaping, curbs, gutters, culverts, sidewalks, bikeways, lighting, bridges, overpasses, underpasses, rail crossings, frontage roads, access roads, interchanges, drainage facilities, mass transit lanes, park-and-ride facilities, toll collection facilities, service areas, administrative or maintenance facilities, gas, electric, water, sewer, and other utilities located or to be located in the right-of-way for a public highway, and other real or personal property, including easements, rights-of-way, and other interests therein, relating to the financing, construction, operation, or maintenance of a public highway.

"Revenues" means any tolls, fees, rates, charges, assessments, grants, contributions, or other income and revenues received by the authority.

"Sales taxes" means, for the purposes of section 43-4-508, county or municipal sales and use taxes levied and collected within a value capture area.

"State" means the state of Colorado or any of its agencies.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire part added, p. 1844, § 1, effective August 27.

L. 96:

(13) and (14) amended, p. 35, § 2, effective March 18.

L. 2000:

(12) amended, p. 472, § 1, effective August 2.

43-4-504. Creation of authorities.

Any combination may create, by contract, an authority which shall be authorized to exercise the functions conferred by the provisions of this part 5 upon the issuance by the director of the division of a certificate stating that the authority has been duly organized according to the laws of the state. Such certificate shall be issued by the director upon the filing with him of a copy of the contract by the combination joining in the creation of the authority and upon a determination by him that each member of the combination is located in the same metropolitan region. The director shall cause such certificate to be recorded in the real estate records in each county which has territory included in the boundaries of the authority. Upon issuance of the certificate by the director of the division, the authority shall constitute a separate political subdivision and body corporate of the state and shall have all of the duties, privileges, immunities, rights, liabilities, and disabilities of a public body politic and corporate.

Any contract establishing an authority shall specify:

The name and purpose of the authority and the public highways to be provided;

The establishment and organization of the board of directors in which all legislative power of the authority is vested, including:

The number of directors, which shall include at least one elected official from each member of the combination, except as provided in subsection (4) of this section; except that all of the directors shall be elected officials from the members of the combination, except as provided in subsection (4) of this section;

The manner of their appointment, their qualifications, their compensation, if any, and the procedure for filling vacancies;

The officers of the authority, the manner of their appointment, and their duties; and

The voting requirements for action by the board; except that, unless specifically provided otherwise, a majority of the voting members of the board shall constitute a quorum and a majority of the quorum shall be necessary for action by the board of directors;

Provisions for the distribution, disposition, or division of assets of the authority;

The boundaries of the authority, which may include territory which, at the time of designation, is not more than one and one-half miles from the proposed center line of the public highway to be constructed but which may not include territory outside of the boundaries of the members of the combination; except that the boundaries of the authority may not include territory which, at the time the territory is included within the boundaries of the authority, is located within the boundaries of a municipality, unless such municipality is either a member of the combination or consents to the inclusion of such territory within the boundaries of the authority;

The term of the contract, which may be for a definite term or until rescinded or terminated, and the method, if any, by which it may be terminated or rescinded; except that the contract may not be rescinded so long as the authority has bonds outstanding;

Provisions for amendment of the contract;

Limitations, if any, on the powers granted by this part 5 which may be exercised by the authority pursuant to this part 5; and

The conditions to be satisfied to add or delete parties to the contract.

No municipality or county shall enter into the contract establishing the authority without holding a hearing thereon. Notice of the time, place, and purpose of the hearing shall be given by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality or county, as the case may be, at least ten days prior to the date of the hearing.

The state, acting by and through the commission and upon the approval of the governor, may join in the contract creating the authority. The number of members on the board to which the state shall be entitled shall be established in the contract, but in no case shall the state be entitled to less than one member of the board. The state member or members of the board shall be appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, for such term as shall be established by the governor.

The appropriate regional transportation agency, if any, the air quality control commission, and the regional planning commission, if any, shall each designate a representative to serve as nonvoting members of the board.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire part added, p. 1845, § 1, effective August 27.

43-4-505. Board of directors.

All powers, privileges, and duties vested in or imposed upon the authority shall be exercised and performed by and through the board. The board, by resolution, may delegate any of the powers of the board to any of the officers or agents of the board; except that, to ensure public participation in policy decisions, the board shall not delegate the following:

Adoption of board policies and procedures;

Approval of final roadway alignments;

Ratification of acquisition of land by negotiated sale;

Instituting an eminent domain action, which may be at a public hearing or in executive session;

Initiating or continuing legal action, not including traffic or toll violations; and

Establishment of fee policies.

The board shall promulgate and adhere to policies and procedures that govern its conduct and provide meaningful opportunities for public input. Such policies shall include standards and procedures for calling an emergency meeting.

Any member of the board shall disqualify himself from voting on any issue with respect to which he has a conflict of interest, unless such member has disclosed such conflict of interest in compliance with section 18-8-308, C.R.S.

The board, in addition to all other powers conferred by this part 5, has the following powers:

To adopt bylaws;

To fix the time and place of meetings, whether within or without the boundaries of the authority, and the method of providing notice of the meetings;

To make and pass orders and resolutions necessary for the government and management of the affairs of the authority and the execution of the powers vested in the authority;

To adopt and use a seal;

To maintain offices at such place or places as it may designate;

To appoint, hire, and retain employees, agents, engineers, attorneys, accountants, financial advisors, investment bankers, and other consultants;

To prescribe methods for auditing and allowing or rejecting claims and demands and methods for the letting of contracts for the construction of improvements, works, or structures, for the acquisition of equipment, or for the performance or furnishing of such labor, materials, or supplies as may be required for carrying out the purposes of this part 5; and

To appoint advisory committees and define the duties thereof.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire part added, p. 1847, § 1, effective August 27.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 402, § 4, effective August 7.

43-4-506. Powers of the authority - inclusion or exclusion of property - determination of public highway alignment.

In addition to any other powers granted to the authority pursuant to this part 5, the authority has the following powers:

To have perpetual existence, except as otherwise provided in the contract;

To sue and be sued;

To enter into contracts and agreements affecting the affairs of the authority;

To establish, collect, and, from time to time, increase or decrease fees, tolls, rates, and charges for the privilege of traveling on any public highway financed, constructed, operated, or maintained by the authority, without any supervision or regulation of such fees tolls, rates, and charges by any board, agency, bureau, commission, or official;

To pledge all or any portion of the revenues to the payment of bonds of the authority;

To construct, finance, operate, or maintain public highways within or without the boundaries of the authority; except that:

The authority shall not construct public highways in any territory located outside the boundaries of the authority and within the boundaries of a municipality without the consent of the governing body of such municipality or within the unincorporated boundaries of a county without the consent of the governing body of such county; and

Upon completion, no public highway of more than three lanes shall have at-grade intersections unless the authority is constructing a public highway to use or connect to existing at-grade infrastructure, the governing body of the municipality, county, or entity that owns the at-grade infrastructure has approved the use of the existing at-grade infrastructure as a part of the public three-lane highway, and the authority and the Colorado department of transportation have executed an intergovernmental agreement that specifies the circumstances under which the construction of an above-grade or below-grade intersection is required and the entity responsible for payment of construction costs to build such intersection.

If the authority is connecting with the at-grade infrastructure of the Colorado department of transportation, the Colorado department of transportation shall be required to give the approval required by sub-subparagraph (A) of this subparagraph (II).

To purchase, trade, exchange, acquire, buy, sell, lease, lease with an option to purchase, dispose of, and encumber real or personal property and any interest therein, including easements and rights-of-way, without restriction or limitation by other statutory or charter provisions;

To have and exercise the power of eminent domain in the manner provided by law for the condemnation of private property for public use and to take any private property necessary to exercise the powers granted in this part 5, either within or without the boundaries of the authority; except that the authority shall not exercise the power of eminent domain with respect to property located outside the boundaries of the authority and within the boundaries of a municipality without the consent of the governing body of such municipality or within the unincorporated boundaries of a county without the consent of the governing body of such county.

To the extent applicable, in addition to any compensation awarded the owner in an eminent domain proceeding pursuant to the requirements of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (h), and any benefits that may be due the owner pursuant to article 56 of title 24, C.R.S., the authority shall additionally reimburse the owner whose property is being acquired or condemned by such authority the following:

An amount representing the reasonable costs of relocating the individuals, families, and business concerns that will be displaced by such authority, including, without limitation, moving expenses and actual direct losses of property resulting from the displacement. In the case of an owner that is a business concern, such amount shall also cover expenses incurred in connection with the reestablishment of such concern, including, without limitation, expenses incurred in connection with the construction of replacement facilities or utility, water, or sewer connections, as well as lost profits that are reasonably related to relocation of the business resulting from the displacement for which reimbursement or compensation is not otherwise made; and

In connection with proceedings for the authority's acquisition or condemnation of property pursuant to this part 5 in which the final value of the property as determined by the court exceeds ten thousand dollars, the court shall award the owner all of such owner's reasonable attorney fees and the reasonable costs of the litigation incurred by such owner where the award by the court in such proceedings equals or exceeds one hundred thirty percent of the last written offer given to the property owner prior to the filing of the condemnation action. For purposes of this sub-subparagraph (B), the reasonable costs of litigation shall include, but not be limited to, those items includable as costs in accordance with section 13-16-122, C.R.S.

To accept real or personal property for the use of the authority and to accept gifts and conveyances upon such terms and conditions as the board may approve;

To establish, and from time to time increase or decrease, a highway expansion fee and collect such fee from persons who own property located within the boundaries of the authority who apply for a building permit for improvements on such property, which permit is issued in accordance with applicable ordinances, resolutions, or regulations of any county or municipality. After such fees have been established by the authority, no building permit shall be issued by any county or municipality for any improvement constructed within the boundaries of the authority until such fees have been paid to the authority.

To impose an annual motor vehicle registration fee of not more than ten dollars for each motor vehicle registered with the authorized agent, as defined in section 42-1-102, of the county by persons residing in all or any designated portion of the members of the combination. The registration fee is in addition to any fee or tax imposed by the state or any other governmental unit. If a motor vehicle is registered in a county which is a member of more than one authority, the total of all fees imposed pursuant to this subsection (1)(k) for any such motor vehicle shall not exceed ten dollars. The authorized agent shall collect the fee and remit the fee to the authority. The authority shall apply the registration fees solely to the financing, construction, operation, or maintenance of public highways.

Repealed.

Repealed.

Repealed.

To have and exercise all rights and powers necessary or incidental to or implied from the specific powers granted by this part 5. Such specific powers shall not be considered as a limitation upon any power necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes and intent of this part 5.

A public highway authority shall not accept or expend federal funds unless such federal funds are in excess of federal funds for the fiscal year commencing July 1, 1987, or unless such federal funds are specifically authorized, allocated, or made available by the federal government, and unless such acceptance or expenditure is consistent with section 43-1-113 (13).

The board may include property within or exclude property from the boundaries of the authority in the manner provided in this subsection (3). Property may not be included within the boundaries of the authority unless it is within the boundaries of the members of the combination, is contiguous to property within the boundaries of the authority at the time of the inclusion, and is not more than two and one-half miles from the proposed center line of the public highway as described in the contract required by section 43-4-504 (2).

Prior to any inclusion or exclusion of property, the board shall cause notice of the proposed inclusion or exclusion to be published in a newspaper of general circulation within the boundaries of the authority and cause such notice to be mailed to the division, to the transportation commission, and to the owners of property to be included or excluded at the last known address described for such owners in the real estate records of the county in which such property is located. Such notice shall describe the property to be included within or excluded from the boundaries of the authority, shall specify the date, time, and place at which the board shall hold a public hearing on the proposed inclusion or exclusion, and shall state that persons having objections to the inclusion or exclusion may appear at such hearing to object to the proposed inclusion or exclusion. The date of such public hearing contained in such notice shall be not less than twenty days after the mailing and publication of the notice. The board at the time and place designated in the notice or at such times and places to which the hearing may be adjourned shall hear all objections to the proposed inclusion or exclusion. The board, upon the affirmative vote of two-thirds of the members of the board, may adopt a resolution including or excluding all or any portion of the property described in the notice. Upon the adoption of such resolution, such property shall be included within or excluded from the boundaries of the authority as set forth in the resolution. Such resolution may be adopted by the board without amending the contract required by section 43-4-504 (2). The resolution shall be filed with the director of the division, who shall cause such resolution to be recorded in the real estate records of each county that has territory included in the boundaries of the authority.

All property excluded from the authority shall thereafter be subject to the revenue-raising powers of the authority only to the extent that such powers have been exercised by the authority against such property prior to the exclusion and to the extent required to comply with agreements with the holders of bonds outstanding at the time of the exclusion. All property included within the authority shall thereafter be subject to the revenue-raising powers of the authority. In no way will this section affect or increase property taxes in the affected territory or jurisdiction.

The board, upon the affirmative vote of two-thirds of the members of the board, may determine the location of the alignment of the public highway, subject only to any limitation existing pursuant to paragraph (f) of subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire part added, p. 1847, § 1, effective August 27.

L. 91:

(2) amended, p. 1134, § 219, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(3) and (4) added, p. 960, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 96:

(1)(l), (1)(m), and (1)(n) repealed, p. 36, § 3, effective March 18.

L. 2000:

(1)(h) amended, p. 1717, § 1, effective June 1; (1)(f) amended, p. 472, § 2, effective August 2.

L. 2002:

(1)(h)(II)(B) amended, p. 952, § 2, effective June 1.

L. 2017:

(1)(k) amended, (HB 17-1107), ch. 101, p. 375, § 32, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

Section 2 of chapter 351, Session Laws of Colorado 2000, provides that the act amending subsection (1)(h) applies to any proceeding involving the acquisition or condemnation of property by a public highway authority through the exercise of its eminent domain powers commenced on or after June 1, 2000, and to any proceeding for the acquisition or condemnation of property by a public highway authority commenced before June 1, 2000, for which there has been neither a final adjudication of the parties' rights with respect to such property nor a final settlement of all claims as of June 1, 2000.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (1)(h)(II)(B), see section 1 of chapter 253, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

43-4-506.5. Traffic laws - toll collection.

The traffic laws of this state, and those of any municipality through which passes a public highway constructed, operated, or maintained by an authority, and such an authority's rules and regulations regarding toll collection and enforcement shall pertain to and govern the use of any such public highway. State and local law enforcement authorities are authorized to enter into traffic and toll enforcement agreements with authorities. Any funds received by a state law enforcement authority pursuant to such toll enforcement agreement shall be subject to annual appropriations by the general assembly to such law enforcement authority for the purpose of performing its duties pursuant to such agreement.

Any authority may adopt, by resolution of its board, rules pertaining to the enforcement of toll collection and evasion and providing a civil penalty for toll evasion. The civil penalty established by an authority for any toll evasion shall be not less than ten dollars nor more than two hundred fifty dollars in addition to any costs imposed by a court. An authority may use state of the art technology, including, but not limited to, automatic vehicle identification photography, to aid in the collection of tolls and enforcement of toll violations. The use of state of the art technology to aid in enforcement of toll violations shall be governed solely by this section.

Any person who evades a toll established by an authority shall be subject to the civil penalty established by that authority for toll evasion. Any peace officer as described in section 16-2.5-101, C.R.S., shall have the authority to issue civil penalty assessments, or municipal summons and complaints if authorized pursuant to a municipal ordinance, for such toll evasion.

At any time that a person is cited for toll evasion, the person operating the motor vehicle involved shall be given either a notice in the form of a civil penalty assessment notice or a municipal summons and complaint. If a civil penalty assessment is issued, such notice shall be tendered by a peace officer as described in section 16-2.5-101, C.R.S., and shall contain the name and address of such person, the license number of the motor vehicle involved, the number of such person's driver's license, the nature of the violation, the amount of the penalty prescribed for the violation, the date of the notice, a place for such person to execute a signed acknowledgment of such person's receipt of the civil penalty assessment notice, a place for such person to execute a signed acknowledgment of liability for the cited violation, and such other information as may be required by law to constitute such notice as a complaint to appear for adjudication of toll evasion pursuant to this section if the prescribed toll, fee, and civil penalty are not paid within twenty days. Every cited person shall execute the signed acknowledgment of the person's receipt of the civil penalty assessment notice.

The acknowledgment of liability shall be executed at the time the cited person pays the prescribed penalty. The person cited shall pay the toll, fee, and civil penalty authorized by the authority involved at the office of such authority, either in person or by postmarking such payment within twenty days of the citation. If the person cited does not pay the prescribed toll, fee, and civil penalty within twenty days of the notice, the civil penalty assessment notice shall constitute a complaint to appear for adjudication of toll evasion in court or in an administrative toll enforcement proceeding, and the person cited shall, within the time specified in the civil penalty assessment notice, file an answer to this complaint in the manner specified in the notice.

If a municipal summons and complaint is issued, the adjudication of the violation shall be conducted and the format of the summons and complaint shall be determined pursuant to the terms of the municipal ordinance authorizing issuance of such a summons and complaint. In no case shall the penalty upon conviction for violation of a municipal ordinance for toll evasion exceed the limit established in subsection (2) of this section.

The respective courts of the municipalities, counties, and cities and counties are given jurisdiction to try all cases arising under municipal ordinances and state laws governing the use of a public highway operated by an authority and arising under the toll evasion civil penalty regulations enacted by authorities. Venue for such cases shall be in the municipality, county, or city and county where the alleged violation of municipal ordinance or state law or of the authority regulation occurred.

At the request of the judicial department, an authority shall consider establishing an administrative toll enforcement process and may, by resolution, adopt rules creating such a process. The rules pertaining to the administrative enforcement of toll evasion shall require notice to the person cited for toll evasion and provide to the person an opportunity to appear at an open hearing conducted by an impartial hearing officer and a right to appeal the final administrative determination of toll evasion to the county court for the county in which the violation occurred.

If an authority establishes an administrative toll enforcement process, no court of a municipality, county, or city and county shall have jurisdiction to hear toll evasion cases arising on a public highway operated by the authority.

A toll evasion case may be adjudicated by an impartial hearing officer in an administrative hearing conducted pursuant to this section and the rules promulgated by an authority. The hearing officer may be an administrative law judge employed by the state or an independent contractor of the authority. The contract for an independent contractor shall grant to the hearing officer the same degree of independence granted to an administrative law judge employed by the state. An authority may enter into contracts pursuant to section 29-1-203, C.R.S., for joint adjudication of toll evasion cases pursuant to this section.

An authority may file a certified copy of an order imposing a toll, fee, and civil penalty that is entered by the hearing officer in an adjudication of a toll evasion with the clerk of the county court in the county in which the violation occurred at any time after the order is entered. The clerk shall record the order in the judgment book of the court and enter it in the judgment docket. The order shall thenceforth have the effect of a judgment of the county court, and execution may issue on the order out of the court as in other cases.

An administrative adjudication of a toll evasion by an authority is subject to judicial review. The administrative adjudication may be appealed as to matters of law and fact to the county court for the county in which the violation occurred. The appeal shall be a de novo hearing.

Notwithstanding the specific remedies provided by this section, an authority shall have every remedy available under the law to enforce unpaid tolls and fees as debts owed to the authority.

The aggregate amount of penalties, exclusive of court costs, collected as a result of civil penalties imposed pursuant to resolutions adopted as authorized in subsection (2) of this section shall be remitted to the authority in whose name the civil penalty assessment notice was issued, and shall be applied by the authority to defray the costs and expenses of enforcing the laws of the state and the rules and regulations of the authority. If a municipal summons or complaint is issued, the aggregate penalty shall be apportioned pursuant to the terms of any enforcement agreement.

In addition to the penalty assessment procedure provided for in subsection (3) of this section, where an instance of toll evasion is evidenced by automatic vehicle identification photography, or other technology not involving a peace officer, a civil penalty assessment notice may be issued and sent by first-class mail, or by any mail delivery service offered by an entity other than the United States postal service that is equivalent to or superior to first-class mail with respect to delivery speed, reliability, and price, by the public highway authority to the registered owner of the motor vehicle involved. The notice shall contain the name and address of the registered owner of the vehicle involved, the license number of the vehicle involved, the time and location of the violation, the amount of the penalty prescribed for the violation, a place for the registered owner of the vehicle to execute a signed acknowledgment of liability for the cited violation, and such other information as may be required by law to constitute the notice as a complaint to appear for adjudication of a toll evasion civil penalty assessment. The registered owner of the vehicle involved in a toll evasion shall be liable for the toll, fee, and civil penalty imposed by the authority, except as otherwise provided by paragraph (a.5) of this subsection (6). If the registered owner of the vehicle does not pay the prescribed toll, fee, and civil penalty within thirty days of the date of the civil penalty assessment notice, the notice shall constitute a complaint to appear for adjudication of a toll evasion in court or in an administrative toll enforcement proceeding, and the registered owner of the vehicle shall, within the time specified in the notice, file an answer to the complaint in the manner specified in the notice. If the registered owner of the vehicle fails to pay in full the outstanding toll, fee, and civil penalty as set forth in the notice or to appear and answer the complaint and request a hearing as specified in the notice, a final order of liability shall be entered against the registered owner of the vehicle for the purposes of enabling the registered owner to appeal pursuant to paragraph (f) of subsection (4) of this section and allowing an authority to proceed to judgment pursuant to paragraph (e) of subsection (4) of this section.

In addition to any other liability provided for in this section, the owner of a motor vehicle who is engaged in the business of leasing or renting motor vehicles is liable for payment of a toll evasion violation civil penalty; except that, at the discretion of such owner:

The owner may obtain payment for a toll evasion violation civil penalty from the person or company who leased or rented the vehicle at the time of the toll evasion through a credit or debit card payment and forward the payment on to the public highway authority; or

The owner may seek to avoid liability for a toll evasion violation civil penalty if the owner of the leased or rented motor vehicle can furnish sufficient evidence that, at the time of the toll evasion violation, the vehicle was leased or rented to another person. To avoid liability for payment, the owner of the motor vehicle shall, within thirty days after receipt of the notification of the toll evasion violation, furnish to the public highway authority an affidavit containing the name, address, and state driver's license number of the person or company who leased or rented such vehicle. As a condition to avoid liability for payment of a toll evasion violation civil penalty, any person or company who leases or rents motor vehicles to a person shall include a notice in the leasing or rental agreement stating that, pursuant to the requirements of this section, the person renting or leasing the vehicle is liable for payment of a toll evasion violation civil penalty incurred on or after the date the person renting or leasing the vehicle takes possession of the motor vehicle. The notice shall inform the person renting or leasing the vehicle that the person's name, address, and state driver's license number shall be furnished to the public highway authority when a toll evasion violation civil penalty is incurred during the term of the lease or rental agreement.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2010, (SB 10-016), ch. 150, p. 518, § 1, effective April 21, 2010.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2005, p. 835, § 1, effective June 1, 2005.)

A court with jurisdiction in a toll evasion case pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (4) of this section or an authority with jurisdiction in a toll evasion case pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (4) of this section may report to the department of revenue any outstanding judgment or warrant or any failure to pay the toll, fee, and civil penalty for any toll evasion. Upon receipt of a certified report from a court or an authority stating that the owner of a registered vehicle has failed to pay a toll, fee, and civil penalty resulting from a final order entered by the authority, the department shall not renew the vehicle registration of the vehicle until the toll, fee, and civil penalty are paid in full. The authority shall contract with and compensate a vendor approved by the department for the direct costs associated with the nonrenewal of a vehicle registration pursuant to this subsection (7). The department has no authority to assess any points against a license under section 42-2-127, C.R.S., upon entry of a conviction or judgment for any toll evasion.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire section added, p. 1831, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 94:

(3) and (6) amended, p. 2572, § 101, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2002:

(7) added, p. 572, § 3, effective May 24.

L. 2003:

(6)(a.5) added, p. 1659, § 1, effective May 14; (3)(a) and (3)(b) amended, p. 1623, § 41, effective August 6; (6)(a), (6)(b), and (7) amended, p. 1388, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2005:

(2), (3)(b), (3)(c), (4), (6)(a), (6)(b), and (6)(c) amended, p. 835, § 1, effective June 1; (2) amended, p. 605, § 1, effective August 8; (7) amended, p. 838, § 2, effective April 1, 2006.

L. 2010:

(4)(f), (6)(a), and (6)(b) amended, (SB 10-016), ch. 150, p. 518, § 1, effective April 21.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (2) by House Bill 05-1104 and Senate Bill 05-097 were harmonized.